Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1939.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:(1) For any state funds expended for activities related to the 2026 fÃ©dÃ©ration internationale de football association (FIFA) world cup games, including but not limited to promotion, marketing, and fan-related opportunities, the department must ensure a material allocation from the total state funds is made to provide access to opportunities for low-income young people in central Washington and across the state to experience this once in a lifetime event.(2) This section expires June 30, 2026.--- END ---